Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201575-323
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 75-301 to 75-343, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Application open stage means the time period from the moment a participating driver logs on to the transportation network company's online-enabled application or platform until the driver accepts a request to transport a passenger and from the moment the driver completes the transaction on the online-enabled application or platform or the passenger exits the vehicle, whichever is later, until the driver either accepts another ride request on the online-enabled application or platform or logs off the online-enabled application or platform;

(2) Engaged stage means the time period from the moment a participating driver accepts a ride request on the transportation network company online-enabled application or platform until the driver completes the transaction on the online-enabled application or platform or until the passenger exits the vehicle, whichever is later;

(3) Insurance policy means a policy placed with an authorized Nebraska insurer or with a surplus lines insurer pursuant to Chapter 44;

(4) Participating driver or driver means any person who uses a personal vehicle in connection with a transportation network company's online-enabled application or platform to connect with passengers;

(5) Passenger means a passenger in a personal vehicle for whom a driver provides transportation and who is connected with a driver by a transportation network company's online-enabled application or platform;

(6) Passengers on board stage means the time period when there are passengers in the vehicle pursuant to the driver's participation in a transportation network company;

(7) Personal vehicle means a passenger car as defined in section 60-345 that a driver owns, leases, or is otherwise authorized to use to provide services on a transportation network company's online-enabled application or platform;

(8) Prearranged ride means a ride in which a participating driver is matched to a passenger through a transportation network company's online-enabled application or platform and does not include the on-demand summoning of a ride or street hail. Prearranged ride does not include shared-expense carpool or vanpool arrangements;

(9) Service means the provision of transportation by a driver to a passenger with whom a transportation network company matches the driver;

(10) Transportation network company means an organization, including a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, a sole proprietor, or any other entity, operating in this state that provides prearranged transportation services for compensation using an online-enabled application or platform to connect passengers with participating drivers using a personal vehicle. Transportation network company does not include medicaid nonemergency medical transportation brokerage services provided pursuant to a contract with the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(11) Transportation network company insurance means an insurance policy that covers loss arising from a participating driver's use of a personal vehicle in connection with a transportation network company's online-enabled application or platform.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 2.